Wyoming, session 2026, SF0115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 120,
Section 1(c)(iii) is amended to read:

Section 1.

(c) Upon approval of the Gillette community
college district by the electors, the following
shall apply to the formation of the Gillette
SF0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0490
community college district and the transition
from the Northern Wyoming community college
district:

(iii) During each year of any
transition period under this subsection, the
Northern Wyoming community college district shall
continue to receive the allocation for both
districts from the funding allocation model
implemented by the community college commission,
until such time that the Gillette community
college district receives institutional
accreditation, or until July 1, 2026, whichever
occurs first.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0115